Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-1640
Fund; proposed uses; hearing.

The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed uses of the fund in the manner and to the extent required by specifications and guidelines of the applicable federal court order and any applicable federal law or regulations.

Laws 1987, LB 683, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 764, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 171;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 460.